Massachusetts, session 194th, S276.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws or any other
general or special, rule or regulation to the contrary, the licensing authority of the Town of
Cohasset may grant five (5) additional licenses for the sale of alcohol to be drunk on the
premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138. A license granted under this section shall be
subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
SECTION 2. If the license granted under this section is cancelled, revoked or no longer
in use, it shall be returned physically with all legal rights, privileges, and restrictions pertaining
thereto, to the licensing authority, which may then grant the license to a new applicant at the
same or a different location; or act in relation thereto.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1